Utah statutes.
17C-1-402.   Taxing entity committee.
(1)  Each agency that adopts or proposes to adopt a post-June 30, 1993 urban
renewal or economic development project area plan shall, and any other agency
may, cause a taxing entity committee to be created.
(2) (a) (i)  Each taxing entity committee shall be composed of:
(A)  two school district representatives appointed as provided in Subsection
(2)(a)(ii);
(B) (I)  in a county of the second, third, fourth, fifth, or sixth class, two
representatives appointed by resolution of the legislative body of the county
in which the agency is located; or
(II)  in a county of the first class, one representative appointed by the
county executive and one representative appointed by the legislative body of
the county in which the agency is located;
(C)  if the agency was created by a city or town, two representatives
appointed by resolution of the legislative body of that city or town;
(D)  one representative appointed by the State Board of Education; and
(E)  one representative selected by majority vote of the legislative bodies or
governing boards of all other taxing entities that levy a tax on property
within the agency's boundaries, to represent the interests of those taxing
entities on the taxing entity committee.
(ii) (A)  If the agency boundaries include only one school district, that
school district shall appoint the two school district representatives under
Subsection (2)(a)(i)(A).
(B)  If the agency boundaries include more than one school district, those
school districts shall jointly appoint the two school district representatives
under Subsection (2)(a)(i)(A).
(b) (i)  Each taxing entity committee representative under Subsection (2)(a)
shall be appointed within 30 days after the agency provides notice of the
creation of the taxing entity committee.
(ii)  If a representative is not appointed within the time required under
Subsection (2)(b)(i), the agency board may appoint a person to serve on the
taxing entity committee in the place of the missing representative until that
representative is appointed.
(c) (i)  A taxing entity committee representative may be appointed for a set
term or period of time, as determined by the appointing authority under
Subsection (2)(a)(i).
(ii)  Each taxing entity committee representative shall serve until a
successor is appointed and qualified.
(d) (i)  Upon the appointment of each representative under Subsection
(2)(a)(i), whether an initial appointment or an appointment to replace an
already serving representative, the appointing authority shall:
(A)  notify the agency in writing of the name and address of the newly
appointed representative; and
(B)  provide the agency a copy of the resolution making the appointment or, if
the appointment is not made by resolution, other evidence of the appointment.
(ii)  Each appointing authority of a taxing entity committee representative
under Subsection (2)(a)(i) shall notify the agency in writing of any change of
address of a representative appointed by that appointing authority.
(3)  At its first meeting, a taxing entity committee shall adopt an organizing
resolution:
(a)  designating a chair and a secretary of the committee; and
(b)  if the committee considers it appropriate, governing the use of
electronic meetings under Section 52-4-207.
(4)  A taxing entity committee represents all taxing entities regarding an
urban renewal or economic development project area and may:
(a)  cast votes that will be binding on all taxing entities;
(b)  negotiate with the agency concerning a draft project area plan;
(c)  approve or disapprove an urban renewal project area budget as provided in
Section 17C-2-204 or an economic development project area budget as provided
in Section 17C-3-203;
(d)  approve or disapprove amendments to a project area budget as provided in
Section 17C-2-206 for an urban renewal project area budget and Section
17C-3-205 for an economic development project area budget;
(e)  approve exceptions to the limits on the value and size of a project area
imposed under this title;
(f)  approve exceptions to the percentage of tax increment and the period of
time that tax increment is paid to the agency as provided in this title;
(g)  approve the use of tax increment for publicly owned infrastructure and
improvements outside of an urban renewal or economic development project area
that the agency and community legislative body determine to be of benefit to
the urban renewal or economic development project area, as provided in
Subsection 17C-1-409(1)(a)(iii)(D);
(h)  waive the restrictions imposed by Subsection 17C-2-202(1); and
(i)  give other taxing entity committee approval or consent required or
allowed under this title.
(5)  A quorum of a taxing entity committee consists of:
(a)  if the urban renewal or economic development project area is located
within a city or town, five members; or
(b)  if the urban renewal or economic development project area is not located
within a city or town, four members.
(6)  Taxing entity committee approval, consent, or other action requires the
affirmative vote of two-thirds of all members present at a taxing entity
committee meeting at which a quorum is present.
(7) (a)  An agency may call a meeting of the taxing entity committee by
sending written notice to the members of the taxing entity committee at least
ten days before the date of the meeting.
(b)  Each notice under Subsection (7)(a) shall be accompanied by:
(i)  the proposed agenda for the taxing entity committee meeting; and
(ii)  if not previously provided and if they exist and are to be considered at
the meeting:
(A)  the urban renewal or economic development project area plan or proposed
plan;
(B)  the urban renewal or economic development project area budget or proposed
budget;
(C)  the analysis required under Subsection 17C-2-103(2) or 17C-3-103(2);
(D)  the blight study;
(E)  the agency's resolution making a finding of blight under Subsection
17C-2-102(1)(a) (ii)(B); and
(F)  other documents to be considered by the taxing entity committee at the
meeting.
(8) (a)  A taxing entity committee may not vote on a proposed urban renewal or
economic development project area budget or proposed amendment to an urban
renewal or economic development project area budget at the first meeting at
which the proposed budget or amendment is considered unless all members of the
taxing entity committee present at the meeting consent.
(b)  A second taxing entity committee meeting to consider an urban renewal or
economic development project area budget or a proposed amendment to an urban
renewal or economic development project area budget may not be held within 14
days after the first meeting unless all members of the taxing entity committee
present at the first meeting consent.
(9)  Each taxing entity committee shall meet at least annually during the time
that the agency receives tax increment under an urban renewal or economic
development project area budget in order to review the status of the project
area.
(10)  Each taxing entity committee shall be governed by Title 52, Chapter 4,
Open and Public Meetings Act.
(11)  Each time a school district representative or a representative of the
State Board of Education votes as a member of a taxing entity committee to
allow an agency to be paid tax increment or to increase the amount or length
of time that an agency may be paid tax increment, that representative shall,
within 45 days after the vote, provide to the representative's respective
school board an explanation in writing of the representative's vote and the
reasons for the vote.
(12) (a)  The auditor of each county in which the agency is located shall
provide a written report to the taxing entity committee stating, with respect
to property within each urban renewal and economic development project area:
(i)  the base taxable value, as adjusted by any adjustments under Section
17C-1-408; and
(ii)  the assessed value.
(b)  With respect to the information required under Subsection (12)(a), the
auditor shall provide:
(i)  actual amounts for each year from the adoption of the urban renewal and
economic development project area plan to the time of the report; and
(ii)  estimated amounts for each year beginning the year after the time of the
report and ending the time that the agency expects no longer to be paid tax
increment from property within the urban renewal and economic development
project area.
(c)  The auditor of the county in which the agency is located shall provide a
report under this Subsection (12):
(i)  at least annually; and
(ii)  upon request of the taxing entity committee, before a taxing entity
committee meeting at which the committee will consider whether to allow the
agency to be paid tax increment or to increase the amount of tax increment
that the agency may be paid or the length of time that the agency may be paid
tax increment.
(13)  This section does not apply to a community development project area
plan.
